Mississippi statutes. Title 61. Aviation
Chapter 17. Concealing or Misrepresenting Aircraft Identification Number; Non-Conforming Aircraft Fuel Containers

§ 61-17-1.
Possession, sale, receipt, etc., of aircraft or part on which identification numbers have been altered, removed, etc.

It shall be unlawful, with intent to conceal or misrepresent the true identity of the aircraft, for any person, firm, association or corporation to knowingly possess, buy, sell, offer for sale, receive, dispose of, conceal or to endeavor to possess, buy, sell, offer for sale, receive, dispose of or conceal, any aircraft or part thereof on which the assigned aircraft identification number has been altered, removed, destroyed, covered or defaced, or to maintain such aircraft in any manner which conceals or misrepresents the true identity of the aircraft.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 427, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 61-17-3.
Failure to display aircraft identification number.

It shall be unlawful, with intent to conceal or misrepresent the true identity of the aircraft, to fail to have the aircraft identification number clearly displayed on the aircraft and in compliance with Federal Aviation Administration regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 427, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 61-17-5.
Maintenance or possession of aircraft with non-conforming fuel container.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association or corporation to knowingly own, maintain or possess any aircraft which has been equipped with or had installed in its wings or fuselage, any fuel tank, bladder, drum or other container which will hold fuel and which does not conform to Federal Aviation Administration regulations or which has not been approved by the Federal Aviation Administration by special permit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 427, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 61-17-7.
Equipping aircraft with, or installing in aircraft, non-conforming fuel container.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association or corporation to equip any aircraft with, or to install in the wings or fuselage of any aircraft, any fuel tank, bladder, drum or other container which will hold fuel and which does not conform to Federal Aviation Administration regulations or which has not been approved by the Federal Aviation Administration by special permit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 427, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 61-17-9.
Ownership or possession of improperly registered aircraft.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association or corporation to knowingly own or possess an aircraft which is improperly registered with intent to conceal or misrepresent the true identity of the aircraft. Any aircraft registered to a nonexistent person, firm, association, corporation or address shall be in violation of this section. Any aircraft registered to a firm, association or corporation that has no physical location, no corporate officers, or has lapsed into an inactive state shall be in violation of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 427, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 61-17-11.
Probable cause to inspect aircraft for violation.

Any law enforcement officer who has reason to believe and does believe that a violation of Sections 61-17-1 through 61-17-9 has occurred shall have probable cause to make further inspection of the aircraft in question to ascertain its true identity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 427, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 61-17-13.
Penalties for violation of §§ 61-17-1 through 61-17-9.

Any person who violates Section 61-17-1 through 61-17-9 shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years or fined not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 427, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1988.